Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4701
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-4701 to 29-4706:

(1) Benefit means any plea bargain, bail consideration, reduction or modification of sentence, or any other leniency, immunity, financial payment, reward, or amelioration of current or future conditions of incarceration that has been requested by the jailhouse informant or that has been offered or may be offered in the future to the jailhouse informant in connection with his or her testimony in the criminal proceeding in which the prosecutor intends to call him or her as a witness; and

(2) Jailhouse informant means a person who offers testimony about statements made by a suspect or defendant while the suspect or defendant and jailhouse informant were in the custody of any jail or correctional institution and who has requested or received or may in the future receive a benefit in connection with such testimony.

Laws 2019, LB352, § 1.